District of Columbia statutes.
7-1203.02

Disclosures under law.

Mental health information may be disclosed by a mental health professional or mental health facility where necessary and, to the extent necessary:

(1)

To meet the requirements of § 21-586 (concerning financial responsibility for the care of hospitalized persons);

(2)

To meet the compulsory reporting provisions of District or federal law that seek to promote human health and safety, including § 4-1371.12; or

(3)

For the purposes of and in accordance with Chapter 2A of this title [§ 7-251 seq.].

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 302, 25 DCR 5055
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4616, 48 DCR 6981
Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 204(a), 57 DCR 7171
This section is referenced in § 4-1371.06 and § 16-1054.
1981 Ed., § 6-2022.
1973 Ed., § 6-1623.
D.C. Law 14-28, inserted “, including § 4-1317.12”.
D.C. Law 18-273 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Mental health information may be disclosed by a mental health professional or mental health facility where necessary and, to the extent necessary, to meet the requirements of § 21-586 (concerning financial responsibility for the care of hospitalized persons) or to meet the compulsory reporting provisions of District or federal law which attempt to promote human health and safety, including § 4-1317.12.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(a) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(a) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).